Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Acquisition, Operation and Maintenance of Telecommunication Systems

§ 25-53-101.
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature hereby declares it essential to the creation and maintenance of an efficient, modern, economically feasible, telecommunications system that there should be full cooperation and cohesive planning and effort by and between the several state agencies and that it is the responsibility of the said Legislature to provide statutory authority therefor. The Legislature, therefore, declares and determines that the responsibility for these and other related purposes shall be vested in the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 25-53-103.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1999, ch. 410, § 5, eff from and after March 17, 1999.

[Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1995]

§ 25-53-105.
Administration and purposes of Sections 25-53-109 through 25-53-125.

The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall administer the provisions of Sections 25-53-109 through 25-53-125. The purposes and aims of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services in carrying out said provisions shall be to coordinate and promote efficiency in the acquisition, operation and maintenance of all telecommunications systems and networks being used by agencies of the state and further to coordinate the compatibility of systems and networks to the state with those of governing authorities so as to promote a uniform, compatible telecommunications system for agencies and governing authorities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 25-53-107.
Promulgation of rules and regulations; employment of personnel.

The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the manner in which the authority and duties prescribed by Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 shall be carried out. It shall employ competent personnel necessary to carry out its purposes, under rules promulgated by the State Personnel Board.

The bureau, during a fiscal year, may utilize time-limited escalated positions in order to implement telecommunications enterprise decisions that yield cost avoidance, cost reductions or revenue increases and so long as the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services can provide the necessary funds without such action causing a telephone service rate increase to agency customers. Such employees of the bureau shall be considered nonstate service employees, shall be highly qualified telecommunications professionals and may be compensated at a rate comparable to the prevailing rate of telecommunications personnel in the private sector. Such compensation rates shall be determined by the State Personnel Director. The number of such positions shall be set by annual appropriation legislation. The compensation and classification of such positions and qualifications of employees shall be set by the State Personnel Board upon recommendation by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services. Nonstate service positions can be recommended for conversion to permanent state service on a case by case basis if the supported function appears long-term in duration, if accomplished in accordance with State Personnel Board procedures, and if properly identified in the state budgetary process.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 25-53-109.
General duties and powers of bureau.

The bureau is hereby authorized and empowered to exercise such duties and powers necessary to effectuate the purposes of Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 including the following:

Form an advisory council made up of persons with expertise, and experience in the field of telecommunications for the purpose of setting goals, establishing long-range plans and policies and to oversee and assist in the procurement activities regarding telecommunications equipment and services;

Provide more effective management of state telecommunications resources and implement long-range plans and procurement;

Manage, plan and coordinate all telecommunications systems under the jurisdiction of the state. This centralized management function would be provided throughout the following activities:

Administration of existing systems including coordination of activities, vendors, service orders and billing/record-keeping functions;

Planning of new systems or services;

Design of replacement systems;

Project management during specification writing, bid letting, proposal evaluation and contract negotiations;

Implementation supervision of new systems and ongoing support;

Implementation of long-term state plans; and

Management of intra-LATA and inter-LATA networks.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 25-53-111.
Additional duties of bureau; justification of requests for increases in expenditures for new telecommunication equipment systems or services; long-range plans for use of telecommunications equipment, systems and services.

The bureau shall have the following additional duties:

To establish and coordinate through either state ownership or commercial leasing, all telecommunications systems and services affecting the management and operations of the state.

To act as the sole centralized customer for the acquisition, billing and record keeping of all telecommunications systems or services provided to state agencies whether obtained through lease or purchase.

To charge respective user agencies for their proportionate cost of the installation, maintenance and operation of the telecommunications systems and services, including the operation of the bureau.

To offer or provide transmission, switch and network services on a reimbursable basis to agencies financed entirely by federal funds, to governing authorities and to other governmental agencies.

To approve or provide state telephone services on a reimbursable basis to full-time students at state institutions of higher learning and junior colleges, including where such services are provided by the state or the institution.

To develop coordinated telecommunications systems or services within and among all state agencies and require, where appropriate, cooperative utilization of telecommunications equipment and services by aggregating users. Where such cooperative utilization of telecommunications system or service would affect an agency authorized to receive information from the National Crime Information Center of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, such plans for cooperative utilization shall first be approved by the National Crime Information Center before implementation of such telecommunications systems or service can proceed.

To review, coordinate, approve or disapprove all requests by state agencies for the procurement, through purchase or contract for lease of telecommunications systems or services including telecommunication proposals, studies and consultation contracts and intra-LATA and inter-LATA transmission channels.

To establish and define telecommunications systems and services specifications and designs so as to assure compatibility of telecommunications systems and services within state government and governing authorities.

To provide a continuous, comprehensive analysis and inventory of telecommunications costs, facilities and systems within state government.

To promote, coordinate or assist in the design and engineering of emergency telecommunications systems, including but not limited to “911” service, emergency medical services and other emergency telecommunications services.

To advise and provide consultation to agencies and governing authorities with respect to telecommunications management planning and related matters and to provide training to users within state government in telecommunications technology and system use.

To develop policies, procedures and long-range plans, consistent with the protection of citizens’ rights to privacy and access to information, for the acquisition and use of telecommunications systems, and to base such policies on current information about state telecommunications activities in relation to the full range of emerging technologies.

Any state agency requesting an increase in expenditure of funds for new telecommunications equipment systems or services shall submit to the Legislative Budget Office with its budget request preceding the fiscal year for which funding is requested detailed justification for such request. The justification shall be provided on forms developed by the bureau in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. In addition, all state agencies shall submit to the bureau, when requested, a long-range plan for use of telecommunications equipment, systems and services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 25-53-113.
Cooperation with bureau by state agencies.

Each and every agency of the state shall give full cooperation to the bureau in furnishing all information of any kind as it pertains to telecommunications.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 25-53-115.
Approval by bureau of rentals, leases and purchases of telecommunications systems.

No agency shall rent, lease, lease/purchase, purchase or in any way own or pay for the operation of any telecommunications system out of any funds available for the use by that agency without the written approval of the bureau.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 25-53-117.
Creation of state obligations for telecommunications systems; conduct of transactions dealing with telecommunications systems.

No agency shall be permitted to obligate the state to any vendor source for a telecommunications system of any kind. All transactions dealing with a telecommunications system shall be conducted through the bureau, and any vendor found in violation of this policy may be prohibited from bidding on such systems for a period of time commensurate with the severity of the violation. Provided, however, that this period shall not exceed twenty-four (24) months.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 25-53-119.
Applicability of Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125.

The bureau shall, subject to the provisions of Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125, have sole authority and responsibility for defining the specific telecommunications equipment, systems and related services to which the provisions of Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 shall be applicable. However, the provisions of Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 shall not be applicable with respect to computer and telecommunications equipment, systems and related services that are only available from a sole source.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 25-53-121.
Equipment support contracts.

The types of contracts permitted in the procurement of telecommunications equipment, systems and related services are defined herein, and the provisions in Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 supplement the provisions of Chapter 7, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services may, on behalf of any state agency, enter into an equipment support contract with a vendor of telecommunications equipment or services for the purchase or lease of such equipment or services in accordance with the following provisions:

Specifications for equipment support contracts shall be developed in advance and shall conform to the following requirements:

Specifications for equipment support contracts shall cover a specific class or classes of equipment and service and may include all features associated with that class or classes.

Specifications in the request for proposals for equipment support contracts shall be developed by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services.

Specifications shall be based on the projected needs of user agencies.

Specifications for equipment support contracts for purchase or lease of telecommunications equipment may include specifications for the maintenance of the equipment desired.

The initial procurement of an equipment support contract, and procurement of equipment and services to be utilized by agencies under an equipment support contract, shall be as follows:

Equipment support contracts shall be awarded by competitive sealed bidding.

A using agency may procure required telecommunications equipment and service available under an equipment support contract through release of a purchase order for the required equipment and service to the vendor holding an equipment support contract. However, such procurement by purchase order shall be accomplished in accordance with the procedures and regulations prescribed by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, and shall be subject to all other statutory requirements including approval by the bureau.

The final authority for entering into equipment support contracts shall rest with the bureau, and such contracts shall be executed by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services in accordance with the procedures and regulations defined by said authority.

Equipment support contracts shall include the following terms and conditions:

Equipment support contracts shall be valid for not more than one (1) fiscal year with the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services having an option to renew for two (2) additional fiscal years. The vendor may vary lease or purchase prices for the optional renewal period(s) by an amount equal to the lesser of the lease or purchase price permitted by that vendor’s contract with the General Services Administration of the United States Government for such equipment and services, or any variance in that vendor’s published list prices for such equipment and services during that fiscal year, provided that any increase may not exceed five percent (5%) and the variance must have been authorized by the initial equipment and service order contract.

The prices stated in such contract shall not change for the period of the contract.

Individual items of telecommunications equipment and service which may be included under an equipment support contract may not have a purchase price greater than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) or a monthly lease price greater than Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00). Such price shall not include costs of maintenance, taxes or transportation.

Equipment support contracts shall include the following annual appropriation dependency clause:

“The continuation of this contract is contingent upon the appropriation of funds to fulfill the requirements of the contract by the Legislature. If the Legislature fails to appropriate sufficient monies to provide for the continuance of the contract, the contract shall terminate on the date of the beginning of the first fiscal year for which funds are not appropriated.”

The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services may on behalf of any state agency enter into contracts for the lease or purchase of telecommunications equipment systems or services in accordance with the following provisions:

The bureau may directly contract for or approve contracts for regulated or tariffed telecommunications services upon determination by the bureau that the application of such service is in the best interests of the State of Mississippi.

All other contracts of this type shall be entered into through request for proposals as defined in Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125.

The justification of such contracts must be presented to the bureau prior to issuance of a request for proposals. Such justification shall identify and consider all cost factors relevant to that contract.

The term of a lease contract shall not exceed sixty (60) months for a system lease valued less than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) and shall not exceed one hundred twenty (120) months for a system lease valued One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) or more.

All lease contracts must contain the following annual appropriation dependency clause:

“The continuation of this contract is contingent upon the appropriation of funds to fulfill the requirements of the contract by the Legislature. If the Legislature fails to appropriate sufficient monies to provide for the continuation of a contract, the contract shall terminate on the date of the beginning of the first fiscal year for which funds are not appropriated.”

The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall maintain a list of all such contracts. This list shall show as a minimum the name of the vendor, the annual cost of each contract and the term of the contract or the purchase cost.

Upon the advance written approval of the bureau, state agencies may extend contracts for the lease of telecommunications equipment, systems and related services on a month-to-month basis for a period not to extend more than one (1) calendar year for the stated lease prices.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 25-53-123.
Method of procurement of nonregulated telecommunications systems.

The only method of procurement permitted for the acquisition of nonregulated telecommunications systems, including equipment and related services, shall be in conformity with the following requirements: All acquisitions of telecommunications equipment, systems and related services involving the expenditures of funds in excess of the dollar amount established in Section 31-7-13(c), or rentals or leases in excess of the dollar amount established in Section 31-7-13(c), for the term of the contract, shall be based upon competitive and open specifications, and contracts therefor shall be entered into only after advertisements for bids are published in one or more daily newspapers having a general circulation in the state not less than fourteen (14) days prior to receiving sealed bids therefor. The authority may reserve the right to reject any or all bids, and if all bids are rejected, the authority may negotiate a contract within the limitations of the specifications so long as the terms of any such negotiated contract are equal to or better than the comparable terms submitted by the lowest and best bidder, and so long as the total cost to the State of Mississippi does not exceed the lowest bid. If the authority accepts one (1) of such bids, it shall be that which is the lowest and best.

When applicable, the bureau may procure equipment, systems and related services in accordance with the law or regulations, or both, which govern the Bureau of Purchasing of the Governor’s Office of General Services or which govern the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services procurement of computer equipment, software and services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 21; Laws, 1999, ch. 410, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 17, 1999).

§ 25-53-125.
General provisions applicable to all procurements under Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125.

The following general provisions shall apply to all procurements under Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125:

No contracts entered into hereunder shall have an initial effective date earlier than the date on which such contract receives approval as required herein.

All changes, modifications and amendments to any contract hereunder shall be approved in advance by the bureau, in addition to any other approvals required by law.

The bureau shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, Section 25-43-1, et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, for the establishment of contract format.

Where written proposals or bids are submitted by vendors, the proposal or bid of the successful vendor shall be incorporated into the final contract consummated with that vendor.

The provisions of Sections 25-53-101 through 25-53-125 shall, with respect to the procurement of telecommunications equipment, systems or related services, supersede specifications of any contradictory or conflicting provisions of Chapter 7, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, and other laws with respect to awarding public contracts.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1995.